District of Columbia statutes.
38-508

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held to be invalid, the remaining provisions and other applications shall not be affected.

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-20, § 10, 26 DCR 380
1981 Ed., § 31-508.
1973 Ed., § 31-2208.